District of Columbia statutes.
1-903.04

Payments from retirement funds.

(a)

The Retirement Board shall determine the amount of any payments for annuities or other retirement or disability benefits (including refunds and lump-sum payments) required to be made from the trust assets of the Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund or the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. The Retirement Board shall make the payments from the appropriate fund.

(b)

Once authorized pursuant to the appropriation process, the Retirement Board may make payments from the Funds sufficient to cover the cost of the management of the assets and the reasonable and necessary administrative expenses of the Retirement Board, including trustee and staff compensation, and liability insurance.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 114, 45 DCR 4045
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 4(a), 52 DCR 2638
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 126, 52 DCR 10637

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-782.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (a), substituted “The Retirement Board shall determine the amount of” for “The Mayor shall notify the Retirement Board”.
D.C. Law 16-91, in par. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.